Utah statutes.
26-28-108.   Preclusive effect of anatomical gift, amendment, or revocation.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (7) and subject to Subsection
(6), in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor, a person
other than the donor is barred from making, amending, or revoking an
anatomical gift of a donor's body or part if the donor made an anatomical gift
of the donor's body or part under Section 26-28-105 or an amendment to an
anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under Section 26-28-106.
(2)  A donor's revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part
under Section 26-28-106 is not a refusal and does not bar another person
specified in Section 26-28-104 or 26-28-109 from making an anatomical gift of
the donor's body or part under Section 26-28-105 or 26-28-110.
(3)  If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of
the donor's body or part under Section 26-28-105 or an amendment to an
anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under Section 26-28-106, another
person may not make, amend, or revoke the gift of the donor's body or part
under Section 26-28-110.
(4)  A revocation of an anatomical gift of a donor's body or part under
Section 26-28-106 by a person other than the donor does not bar another person
from making an anatomical gift of the body or part under Section 26-28-105 or
26-28-110.
(5)  In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift under Section 26-28-104, an
anatomical gift of a part is neither a refusal to give another part nor a
limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of another part at a later time
by the donor or another person.
(6)  In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift under Section 26-28-104, an
anatomical gift of a part for one or more of the purposes set forth in Section
26-28-104 is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of the part
for any of the other purposes by the donor or any other person under Section
26-28-105 or 26-28-110.
(7)  If a donor who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the donor who
is reasonably available may revoke or amend an anatomical gift of the donor's
body or part.
(8)  If an unemancipated minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent of the
minor who is reasonably available may revoke the minor's refusal.
